Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2718
Flock of origin, defined.

Flock of origin means the flock in which an animal most recently resided in which it either was born, gave birth, or was used for breeding purposes. The determination that an animal originated in a flock may be based either on the physical presence of the animal in the flock, the presence of official identification on the animal traceable to the flock, the presence of other identification on the animal that is listed on the bill of sale, or other evidence to be determined by the designated scrapie epidemiologist.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 18.